Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDER INCENTIVES
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section, “behavioral  health care” means services and
supports for individuals who have mental health disorders or substance use disorders.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall establish a program to award  grants to eligible
entities. The grants awarded under this section  must be used to foster the recruitment and
retention of behavioral health care providers at the eligible entity.
(3) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, the following entities are eligible  to receive
grants under this section, if  the entity meets the requirements described in subsection (4)
of this section:
(a) Urban Indian health programs operated by an urban Indian  organization pursuant to
25 U.S.C. 1651 et seq.;
(b) Recipients of the authority’s tribal mental health program grants;
(c) Qualified medical providers that offer office-based medication-assisted treatment
services; and
(d) Other entities that are not hospitals and that:
(A) Have been certified by the authority to provide behavioral health care;
(B) Provide behavioral health care through a program contracting with or  administered
by the Oregon Youth Authority;
(C) Are licensed opioid treatment programs; or
(D) Provide withdrawal management services.
(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, an entity described in subsection (3) of  this
section is eligible to receive a grant under this section if the entity:
(a) Provides behavioral health care to adults  or youth, of which at least 50 percent are
uninsured or enrolled in the state medical assistance program or Medicare;
(b) Operates an outpatient or residential facility;
(c) Provides team-based care; and
(d) Serves individuals with  acute behavioral health needs, as defined by the Oregon
Health Authority by rule.
Enrolled House Bill 2024 (HB 2024-B) Page 1
(5) The crisis hotline center described in ORS 430.627 is eligible  to receive grants under
this section.
(6) An entity that receives a grant under subsection (2) of this section  may use the funds
to provide the following incentives to behavioral health  care providers, in an effort to in-
crease the recruitment and retention of behavioral health care providers at the entity:
(a) Scholarships for undergraduate and graduate students going into  the behavioral
health care field;
(b) Loan forgiveness and repayment incentives;
(c) Tuition assistance; and
(d) Stipends for students enrolled in graduate behavioral  health care educational pro-
grams.
(7)(a) An entity that receives a grant under subsection (2) of this section shall  report to
the Oregon Health Authority, in the form  and manner prescribed by the authority, on how
the entity spent the grant and how the expenditures impacted the recruitment and retention
of behavioral health care providers  at the entity. The report must include, as applicable to
the entity, the following information:
(A) The licensure, certification or position type of each behavioral  health care provider
who received an incentive listed in subsection (6) of this section;
(B) The amount of grant moneys spent per behavioral health care provider; and
(C) The entity’s staffing vacancy rate prior to receiving the grant under  subsection (2)
of this section and after receiving the grant under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) In prescribing the form and manner of the report  described in this subsection, the
authority shall seek  to minimize the administrative burden imposed on the entities to the
extent practicable.
SECTION 2.
 Section 20, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 20. (1) The United We Heal Medicaid Payment Program is established in the Oregon Health
Authority. The goal of the program is to  increase the available behavioral health care workforce in
this state through workforce recruitment and retention strategies . The authority shall provide
supplemental medical assistance  payments to eligible behavioral health care [ providers] entities to
enable the [ providers] entities to access enhanced apprenticeship and training  programs and op-
portunities , increased wages, health care benefits and workplace safety standards  by partic-
ipating in a labor-management training trust.
(2) The authority shall  prescribe by rule eligibility criteria for receiving the payments consistent
with the goal of the program expressed in subsection (1) of this section.
(3) To participate in the program, a behavioral health [ provider must ] care entity shall  enter
into a memorandum of understanding with the authority specifying how the [ payments will be used ]
entity will use the payments received under this section . Allowable uses of payments under
this section must include enhanced opportunities for apprenticeships  and on-the-job training,
wraparound services, increased wages,  health care benefits and workplace safety standards
through participation in a labor-management training  trust.  The authority shall terminate
payments if the [ provider] entity fails to abide  by or violates the terms of the memorandum of
understanding. [ A provider ] An entity  may  request a contested case proceeding to challenge a ter-
mination.
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH WORKER SAFETY
SECTION 3.  ORS 654.062 is amended to read:
654.062. (1) Every  employee should notify the employer of any violation of law, regulation or
standard pertaining to safety and health in the  place of employment when the violation comes to the
knowledge of the employee.
(2) However, any employee  or representative of the employee may complain to the Director of
the Department  of Consumer and Business Services or any authorized representatives of the director
Enrolled House Bill 2024 (HB 2024-B) Page 2
of any violation of law, regulation or standard pertaining  to safety and health in the place of em-
ployment, whether or not the employee also notifies the employer.
(3) Upon receiving any employee complaint, the director shall make inquiries, inspections and
investigations that the director considers reasonable and appropriate. When an employee or  repre-
sentative of the employee has complained in writing of an  alleged violation and no resulting citation
is issued to the employer, the director shall  furnish to the employee or representative of the em-
ployee, upon written request, a statement of reasons for the decision.
(4) The director shall establish procedures  for keeping confidential the identity of any employee
who requests protection in writing.  When a request has been made, neither a written complaint from
an employee, or representative of  the employee, nor a memorandum containing the identity of a
complainant may be disclosed under ORS 192.311 to 192.478.
(5) It is an unlawful employment practice for any person to bar or discharge from  employment
or otherwise discriminate against any employee or prospective employee because the employee  or
prospective employee has:
(a) Opposed any practice forbidden by ORS 654.001 to 654.295,  654.412 to 654.423 and 654.750 to
654.780;
(b) Made any  complaint or instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under or related
to ORS 654.001 to 654.295, 654.412 to 654.423 and 654.750 to 654.780,  or has testified or is about to
testify in any such proceeding;
(c) Exercised on behalf of  the employee, prospective employee or others any right afforded by
ORS 654.001 to 654.295, 654.412 to 654.423 and 654.750 to 654.780;
(d) In good faith reported an assault that occurred on  the premises of a health care employer
as defined in ORS 654.412 or in the home of a patient receiving home health care services; or
(e) With no reasonable alternative and in good faith, refused to expose the employee  or pro-
spective employee to serious injury or death arising from a hazardous condition  at a place of em-
ployment.
(6)(a) Any employee or prospective employee alleging to have been barred or discharged from
employment or otherwise discriminated against  in compensation, or in terms, conditions or privi-
leges of employment,  in violation of subsection (5) of this section may, within one year after the
employee or prospective employee has reasonable cause to believe that the  violation has occurred,
file a complaint with  the Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries alleging discrimi-
nation under the provisions of ORS 659A.820. Upon receipt of the complaint  the commissioner shall
process the complaint under the procedures, policies and remedies established by ORS chapter 659A
and the policies established by ORS  654.001 to 654.295, 654.412 to 654.423 and 654.750 to 654.780 in
the same way and to the same extent that the complaint  would be processed if the complaint in-
volved allegations of unlawful employment practices under ORS 659A.030 (1)(f).
(b) Within 90 days after receipt  of a complaint filed under this subsection, the commissioner
shall notify the complainant of the commissioner’s determination.
(c) The affected employee or prospective employee may bring a civil action  in any circuit court
of the State of Oregon against any person  alleged to have violated subsection (5) of this section.
The civil action must be commenced within  one year after the employee or prospective employee
has reasonable cause to believe a violation has occurred, unless a complaint  has been timely filed
under ORS 659A.820.
(d) Subject to paragraph (e) of this  subsection,  the commissioner or the circuit court may
order all appropriate relief including rehiring or reinstatement to  the employee’s former position
with back pay.
(e) If the commissioner or the  circuit court finds that a behavioral health employer dis-
charged an employee in violation of subsection (5) of this  section, the employee shall have
the right to be reinstated to the employee’s former position with back pay.
(7)(a) In any action brought under subsection (6) of this section,  there is a rebuttable
presumption that a violation of subsection (5) of this section  has occurred if a person bars or dis-
charges an employee or prospective  employee from employment or otherwise discriminates against
Enrolled House Bill 2024 (HB 2024-B) Page 3
an employee or prospective employee within 60 days  after the employee or prospective employee has
engaged in any of the protected  activities described in subsection (5)(a) to (e) of this section. The
person may  rebut the presumption that a violation of subsection (5) of this section has occurred by
a demonstration of a preponderance of the evidence.
(b) If a person bars or discharges an  employee or prospective employee from employment or
otherwise discriminates against  the employee or prospective employee more than 60 days after the
employee or prospective employee has engaged in any of  the protected activities described under
subsection (5)(a) to (e) of this section,  such action does not create a presumption in favor of or
against finding that a violation of subsection (5) of this section has  occurred. Where such action has
occurred more than  60 days after the protected activity, this subsection does not modify any existing
rule of case law relating to the proximity of time between  a protected activity and an adverse em-
ployment action. The burden of proof shall be on the employee or  prospective employee to demon-
strate by a preponderance of the evidence that a violation occurred.
(8) The director shall adopt rules necessary for the administration  of subsection (5)(e) of this
section that are in accordance  with the federal Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970 (29
U.S.C. 651 et seq.).
(9) As used in this section, “behavioral health employer” means:
(a) A residential treatment facility, as defined in ORS 443.400;
(b) A residential treatment home, as defined in ORS 443.400;
(c) A secure residential treatment facility, as described  in ORS 443.465, unless the facility
is located on an Oregon State Hospital campus or otherwise operated by the state;
(d) A secure residential treatment home, as described in ORS 443.465;
(e) A sobering facility, as defined in ORS 430.306;
(f) A detoxification center, as defined in ORS 430.306;
(g) A halfway house, as defined in ORS 430.306;
(h) A mobile crisis intervention team, as defined in ORS 430.626; or
(i) An emergency shelter.
SECTION 4.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Residential treatment facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
(b) “Residential treatment home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.400.
(c) “Secure residential treatment facility” means a facility described in ORS 443.465.
(d) “Secure residential treatment home” means a home described in ORS 443.465.
(2) A residential treatment  facility, residential treatment home, secure residential
treatment facility or  secure residential treatment home may place reasonable limitations,
as defined by the Oregon Health  Authority by rule, on a resident’s access to and possession
of alcohol, marijuana and weapons, including firearms and knives.
SECTION 5.
(1) As used in this section, “behavioral health employer” means:
(a) A residential treatment facility, as defined in ORS 443.400;
(b) A residential treatment home, as defined in ORS 443.400;
(c) A secure residential treatment facility, as described  in ORS 443.465, unless the facility
is located on an Oregon State Hospital campus or otherwise operated by the state;
(d) A secure residential treatment home, as described in ORS 443.465;
(e) A sobering facility, as defined in ORS 430.306;
(f) A detoxification center, as defined in ORS 430.306;
(g) A halfway house, as defined in ORS 430.306;
(h) A mobile crisis intervention team, as defined in ORS 430.626; or
(i) An emergency shelter.
(2) A behavioral health employer shall provide training to  workers that, at a minimum,
addresses:
(a) General worker safety  that focuses on providing workers with skills and knowledge
regarding:
Enrolled House Bill 2024 (HB 2024-B) Page 4
(A) The potential risks that a worker may  face in the work environment of a particular
behavioral health setting, including but not  limited to behavioral health settings involving
mobile crisis intervention teams, as defined in ORS 430.626.
(B) Protocols for using safety equipment, emergency communication  devices and alert
systems in emergency or crisis situations.
(b) De-escalation techniques for managing and mitigating  potentially aggressive behavior
from clients.
(c) The available options for  reporting alleged workplace safety violations and allegations
of discrimination, retaliation or harassment to the Occupational Safety and Health Division
of the Department of Consumer and Business Services, the Bureau of  Labor and Industries
and other relevant state agencies, including  the rights and protections afforded to workers
who engage in such reporting.
(3) Training provided under  this section must incorporate simulated scenarios and role-
playing to ensure workers have an opportunity to apply the  training principles in real-world
scenarios.
(4) A behavioral health employer  shall provide the training under this section to new
workers within 90 days of hiring, and periodically thereafter,  but not less than once every
three years.
(5) Each behavioral health employer shall retain records documenting the  completion of
the training required under this section. At a minimum, the  records must include the date
of training, topics covered and the names of the workers who attended the training.  The
records shall be made available, upon request, to the division.
SECTION 6.
(1) Section 5 of this 2025 Act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
(2) The Department of  Consumer and Business Services may take any action before the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of  this section that is necessary to enable the de-
partment to exercise, on and after the  operative date specified in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion, all of  the duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by section 5 of this
2025 Act.
APPROPRIATIONS
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter __, Oregon  Laws 2025 (En-
rolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025,  for Medicaid, is increased by
$995,154 for the purpose of carrying out section 20, chapter 70, Oregon Laws 2024, as amended
by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 8.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established  by section 5 (1), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, other  than those described in section 2, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill  5025), collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority for
Medicaid, is increased by $862,718 for  the purpose of carrying out section 20, chapter 70,
Oregon Laws 2024, as amended by section 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter __, Oregon  Laws 2025 (En-
rolled House Bill 5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for behavioral health, is in-
creased by $4,974,618 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions  of section 1 of this 2025
Act.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established  by section 5 (2), chapter __, Oregon Laws 2025 (Enrolled House Bill
5025), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, other  than those described in section 2, chapter __, Oregon Laws 2025
Enrolled House Bill 2024 (HB 2024-B) Page 5
(Enrolled House Bill 5025), collected or  received by the Oregon Health Authority for behav-
ioral health, is increased by $274,489 for the purpose of carrying out the  provisions of section
1 of this 2025 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 11. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 12. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2024 (HB 2024-B) Page 6